Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1293.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1210.508J of Title 70, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving


fund for the State Department of Education to be designated the


“LETRS Training Revolving Fund”. The fund shall be a continuing


fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of


all monies received by the Department from state appropriations


provided for the purpose of implementing the provisions of


subsection B of this section. All monies accruing to the credit of

Req. No. 2610 Page 1


the fund are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by


the Department for the purpose provided for in this subsection.


Expenditures from the fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the


State Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by law with the


Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services for


approval and payment.


B. Subject to the availability of funding, the State Department


of Education shall utilize the LETRS Training Revolving Fund created


in subsection A of this section to provide training in Language


Essentials for Teachers of Reading and Spelling (LETRS) to


prekindergarten, kindergarten, first, second, and third grade


certified teachers employed by public schools in this state with the


goal of providing training to all such teachers within five (5)


years.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-2610 EB 12/22/2025 11:01:27 AM







Req. No. 2610 Page 2